Illinois, session 104th, HB3236.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 252 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/252 new)7    Sec. 252. Manufacturing capital expenditure credit. For 8taxable years that begin on or after January 1, 2025 and begin 9prior to January 1, 2036, each taxpayer that is engaged in the 10business of manufacturing (North American Industry 11Classification System code 31-33) is entitled to a credit 12against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 13Section 201 in an amount equal to 10% of the capital 14expenditures incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year 15that are related to manufacturing. The total amount of credits 16awarded under this Section may not exceed $10,000,000 for any 17particular taxpayer in any taxable year, except that, if the 18capital investment is made in a rural or economically 19challenged area, as determined by the Department of Commerce 20and Economic Opportunity, then the amount of the credit shall 21be 15% of the capital expenditure, and the maximum amount of 22the credit shall be $20,000,000. A taxpayer may not claim a 23credit under this Section if the taxpayer claims a credit   HB3236- 2 -LRB104 06546 HLH 16582 b1against the taxes imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 2Section 201 for the same capital expenditure under any other 3provision of law.4    In no event shall a credit under this Section reduce the 5taxpayer's liability under this Act to less than zero. The 6credit may not be carried forward or back.  7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.